Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-310
Mayor; head of city government; powers and duties.

The mayor shall be the chief executive officer of a city of the primary class. The executive and administrative power of a city of the primary class shall be vested in and exercised by the mayor, who shall also be the ceremonial head of the city government. The mayor shall enforce the city ordinances and all applicable laws. The mayor may administer oaths, may perform all the duties devolving upon a magistrate, and shall sign commissions and appointments of all officers appointed by him or her with city council approval.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 22, p. 78;

R.S.1913, § 4487;

C.S.1922, § 3873;

C.S.1929, § 15-310;

R.S.1943, § 15-310;

Laws 1963, c. 56, § 1, p. 236;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 89.